apertium-oss.oss.dix
<dictionary>
  <!-- Note, this includes some Latin ligatures (e.g. ӕ) that are replaced with Cyrillic in the ACX -->
  <alphabet>АӔБВГГуГъГъуДДжДзЕЗИЙККуКъКъуЛМНОППъРСТТъУФХХуХъХъуЦЦъЧЧъЫаӕбвггугъгъуддждзезийккукъкъулмноппърсттъуфххухъхъуццъччъыШÆэæяЭшцЯюь</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"       c="Noun (Substantive)"/>
    <sdef n="np"      c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="pr"      c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="prn"     c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="num"     c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="post"    c="Postposition"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"  c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"  c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="adv"     c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"   c="Verb 'to be'"/>

    <sdef n="enc"     c="Enclitic"/>
    <sdef n="dem"     c="Demonstrative"/>

    <sdef n="sg"      c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"      c="Plural"/>

    <sdef n="p1"      c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"      c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"      c="Third person"/>

    <sdef n="org"     c="Organisation"/>

    <sdef n="nom"     c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="gen"     c="Genitive"/>
    <sdef n="dat"     c="Dative"/>
    <sdef n="all"     c="Allative"/>
    <sdef n="abl"     c="Ablative"/>
    <sdef n="ine"     c="Inessive"/>
    <sdef n="ads"     c="Adessive"/>
    <sdef n="equ"     c="Equative"/>
    <sdef n="com"     c="Comitative"/>
    <sdef n="voc"     c="Vocative"/> <!-- Limited use -->

    <sdef n="pres"    c="Present indicative"/>
    <sdef n="pri"     c=""/>
    <sdef n="pii"     c="Past indicative"/>
    <sdef n="fti"     c="Future indicative"/>
    <sdef n="pfs"     c=""/>
    <sdef n="prf"     c=""/>
    <sdef n="pis"     c="Past subjunctive"/>
    <sdef n="fts"     c="Future subjunctive"/>
    <sdef n="imp"     c="Imperative"/>
    <sdef n="pp"      c="Past participle"/>
    <sdef n="ger"     c="Gerund"/>

  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
    <!-- Numerals -->

    <pardef n="цыппар__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ы</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕн</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>мӕ</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="all"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕй</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ы</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ыл</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ads"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ау</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="equ"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>имӕ</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="аст__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ы</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕн</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>мӕ</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="all"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕй</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ы</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ine"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ыл</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ads"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ау</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="equ"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>имӕ</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Pronouns -->

    <pardef n="pers_p1sg__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ӕз</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>мӕн</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>мӕнӕн</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>мӕнмӕ</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>мӕнӕй</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>мӕныл</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ads"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>мӕнау</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="equ"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>мемӕ</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pers_p2sg__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ды</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>дӕу</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>дӕуӕн</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>дӕумӕ</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>дӕуай</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>дӕуыл</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ads"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>дӕуау</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="equ"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>демӕ</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pers_p3sg__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уый</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уый</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уымӕн</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уымӕ</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="all"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уымӕй</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ууыл</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ads"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уыйау</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="equ"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уыимӕ</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="цыппар"><i>цыппар</i><par n="цыппар__num"/></e>
    <e lm="фондз"><i>фондз</i><par n="аст__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ӕхсӕз"><i>ӕхсӕз</i><par n="цыппар__num"/></e>
    <e lm="авд"><i>авд</i><par n="аст__num"/></e>
    <e lm="аст"><i>аст</i><par n="аст__num"/></e>
    <e lm="фараст"><i>фараст</i><par n="аст__num"/></e>
    <e lm="дӕс"><i>дӕс</i><par n="цыппар__num"/></e>
    <e lm="иуӕндӕс"><i>иуӕндӕс</i><par n="цыппар__num"/></e>
    <e lm="дыууадӕс"><i>дыууадӕс</i><par n="цыппар__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ӕртындӕс"><i>ӕртындӕс</i><par n="цыппар__num"/></e>
    <e lm="цыппӕрдӕс"><i>цыппӕрдӕс</i><par n="цыппар__num"/></e>
    <e lm="фынддӕс"><i>фынддӕс</i><par n="цыппар__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ӕхсӕрдӕс"><i>ӕхсӕрдӕс</i><par n="цыппар__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ӕвддӕс"><i>ӕвддӕс</i><par n="цыппар__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ӕстдӕс"><i>ӕстдӕс</i><par n="цыппар__num"/></e>
    <e lm="нудӕс"><i>нудӕс</i><par n="цыппар__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ссӕдз"><i>ссӕдз</i><par n="цыппар__num"/></e>
